Illinois, session 104th, HB233.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Unsolicited Credit Card Act of 1977 is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 150/1)  (from Ch. 17, par. 6201)7    Sec. 1. This Act may be cited as the the Unsolicited Credit 8Card Act of 1977.9(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)